Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 11 Forest Fire Personnel

2-11-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Authorized representative” means anyone recognized and/or appointed and/or commissioned by the director of the department of environmental management to exercise and pursue the laws, rules and regulations intended by this chapter.

“Authorized senior officer” means a member of a fire organization who is authorized by the fire chief to issue burning permits.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Fire chief” means the elected, appointed, designated or recognized leader and member of a fire organization.

“Flammable material” means any substance that will burn, including, but not limited to, refuse, debris, waste, forest material, brush, stumps, logs, rubbish, fallen timber, grass, stubble, leaves, fallow land, slash crops or crop residue.

“Forest fire” or “Wildland fire” means any fire occurring on forest land or wildland.

“Forest land” or “Wildland” means timbered land, potential timber producing land, cutover or burned timber land or grass lands not including lands devoted to agriculture.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, municipality, other public body, legal entity, employee or agent of the person.

“Senior officer” means a member of a fire organization who would be next in command during the absence of the fire chief.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.

2-11-2.
Designation of fire chief, senior officer, and forest fire district.

The local chief shall be elected, appointed, or designated by the procedure established and within the framework spelled out in the fire company or fire district, city or town charter, by-laws, constitution, or any other existing format for appointment
of a fire chief. The fire chief’s term of office is recognized as that which is spelled out in the fire company or fire district, city or town charter, by-laws, constitution, or any other existing format for such term of appointment.
The fire chief elected, appointed, or designated shall forthwith notify the director of the department of environmental management of the election, appointment, or designation and shall further notify the director of his or her specific
forest fire district and jurisdiction. The director may then enter into agreements with each fire chief and fire company to provide assistance and to accept assistance in the prevention and control of forest fires and enforcement of
forest fire laws that may include training of personnel. It is the responsibility of the city or town council to appoint a qualified resident to forest fire chief and to designate a forest fire company for any portion of the city or
town not protected by an existing fire chief and fire company. If the city or town council of any city or town shall fail to appoint a fire chief as required by this section, the director of the department of environmental management
shall appoint some qualified resident of the city or town to act as fire chief until an appointment shall be made by the city or town council as provided in this section. In any fire company or fire district, the fire chief shall establish
and define his or her forest fire district and jurisdiction and shall designate a qualified resident of each district to serve as authorized senior officer. Any designated senior officer shall serve at the pleasure of the fire chief
by whom he or she was designated. A fire chief shall notify the director of the department of environmental management of each authorized senior officer designated by him or her, and of each removal from designation by him or her,
forthwith upon the designation or removal.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 39.

2-11-3.
Compensation of fire chief, senior officer, and their employees.

Each fire chief, senior officer, and employee of any fire chief or senior officer shall receive an hourly rate equivalent to the existing state minimum hourly wage as prescribed by the minimum wage law, chapter 12 of title 28. Payment will be for his
or her actual services rendered under this chapter and chapter 12 of this title in extinguishing forest fires. A person summoned by a fire chief or senior officer to assist in the extinguishment of a forest fire may be allowed once
in any one day a three (3) hour minimum pay. Payment for property used under the direction of the fire chief or senior officer shall be made at a rate prescribed by the director of the department of environmental management. In addition
to this compensation, each fire chief shall be paid one hundred dollars ($100) a year. This sum shall be in lieu of all allowances for making reports, for postage, for posting notices, for issuing permits, for telephoning, and for
other services not provided in this chapter, provided that these services actually have been rendered, or that the expenses have been incurred.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.

2-11-4.
Patrols during drought.

During a period of drought, the local fire chief or senior officer in the fire company may require and request their fire personnel to patrol their districts, provided approval for the patrolling is first obtained from the director of the department of
environmental management and the expenses for the patrolling are paid at the same rate and in the same way as for fighting fires.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.

2-11-5.
Reports of fires.

Within two (2) weeks after any forest fire, the local fire chief of the local fire district in which the fire occurs shall mail a report of the fire to the director of the department of environmental management using the printed form furnished for that
purpose. In case any local fire chief fails to make the report as required by this section, or the local fire chief fails to transmit a copy of the itemized account as provided in §

2-11-6

, the fire department or fire district shall not receive from the state the payment due under §

2-11-6

for extinguishing the fire.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 1971, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 39.

2-11-6.
Payments to local fire companies and districts.

Of the money required for all payments for the property used, and services rendered in extinguishing forest fires, fifty percent (50%) shall be paid by the state to the local fire company or fire district. The payment for work done in preventing and extinguishing
forest fires shall not be made until an itemized account of all the labor performed and materials used is submitted by the local fire chief of the forest fire district or jurisdiction in which the work is done or the assistance rendered,
and is approved for payment by the local fire chief of the forest fire district or jurisdiction, who shall, within sixty (60) days from the date of any fire, transmit a copy of the itemized account and order for payment to the director
of the department of environmental management for the director’s approval and when the itemized account and order for payment is approved the director shall transmit the account and order to the state controller who shall draw his
or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of fifty percent (50%) of the money to the local fire company or fire district.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-6

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.

2-11-7.
Incidental expenses.

The clerical work, posters, signs, printed matter and other supplies furnished by the director of the department of environmental management under this chapter and chapter 12 of this title, may be paid for out of the appropriation made as prescribed in
§

2-11-11

; provided, that any fire company, district, or any city or town may pay for any additional service for the prevention or extinguishment of forest fires that the fire company, district, or city or town council may authorize.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 3.

2-11-8.
Badges.

Every fire chief or senior officer shall, when on duty, wear in plain sight a badge inscribed with the state seal and the words fire chief or senior officer.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-8

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 3.

2-11-9.
Enforcement powers of fire chiefs.

The fire chiefs shall enforce all laws relating to forest fires, and shall not be required to give surety for costs upon any complaint made by him or her. The fire chiefs shall have the power to arrest without a warrant any person detected in the act
of setting or maintaining fire unlawfully.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-9

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.

2-11-10.
Subpoena of witnesses.

For the purpose of investigating the causes of fire, the fire chiefs shall have the power to subpoena witnesses.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-10

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.

2-11-11.
State appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 12 of this title and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment of the sums appropriated, or so much of the sums as may be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-11-11

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 2.